West Virginia, session 2026, SB311.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. Authorization for Department of transportation to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 8 - 1. Division of Motor Vehicles. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §17A-13-1 of this code, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (special purpose vehicles, 91 CSR 25), is authorized.